Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2435YH (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 692 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 483A.8D Disabled veteran ââ deer 1 hunting license. 2 A resident of the state who has served in the armed forces 3 of the United States on federal active duty and who was 4 disabled during the veteranâs military service, as verified 5 by the department of veterans affairs, may use a deer hunting 6 license and tag issued to the person during any established 7 deer hunting season for which the method of take for the season 8 being hunted corresponds with the method of take authorized 9 by the license. While hunting pursuant to this section, the 10 person shall, upon request of a peace officer, display proof of 11 the personâs resident and disability status in the same manner 12 and subject to the same procedures and penalties as provided 13 by section 483A.19. As used in this section, âdisabledâ means 14 entitled to a service connected rating under 38 U.S.C. ch. 11. 15